Utah statutes.
11-51-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Chief executive officer" means:

(a)  for a municipality:

(i)  the mayor, if the municipality is operating under a form of municipal government other than the council-manager form of government; or

(ii)  the city manager, if the municipality is operating under the council-manager form of government; or

(b)  for a county:

(i)  the chair of the county commission, if the county is operating under the county commission or expanded county commission form of government;

(ii)  the county executive officer, if the county is operating under the county-executive council form of government; or

(iii)  the county manager, if the county is operating under the council-manager form of government.

(2)  "County sheriff" means an individual elected to the office of county sheriff in the state who meets the qualifications described in Section 17-22-1.5.

(3)  "Federal agency" means the United States Bureau of Land Management or the United States Forest Service.

(4)  "Federally managed land" means land that is managed by the United States Bureau of Land Management or the United States Forest Service.

(5)  "Political subdivision" means a municipality or county.



Enacted by Chapter 342, 2013 General Session

